Hawaii statutes.
§663-13 Judgment against one tortfeasor.
The recovery of a judgment by the injured person against one joint tortfeasor
does not discharge the other joint tortfeasors. [L 1941, c 24, §3; RL 1945,
§10489; RL 1955, §246-12; HRS §663-13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next